Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-121 of Title 26, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The name of any presidential candidate who violates federal
constitutional eligibility requirements shall not appear on a
ballot. The term "federal constitutional eligibility requirements"
shall mean the requirements to hold the office of President found in
the Constitution of the United States, and the amendments thereto.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14213 MJ 12/03/25

Req. No. 14213 Page 1